Missouri, session 2026, HB2117.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.898, to read as follows:
227.898. The portion of State Highway WW from State Highway 13 continuing
2 to State Highway H in Greene County shall be designated the "Gary D McCormack
3 Nemo Macto Unus Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect
4 and maintain appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by
5 the department of transportation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.